District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Community Service Debt Repayment Program Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 2(i) of the Traffic and Parking Ticket Penalty Amendment Act of 2018,
effective October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-175; D.C. Official Code § 50-2303.21) is revived as of
the effective date of this act and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 321. Community Service Debt Repayment Program.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Gross income” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 505(3)
of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-
101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.05(3)).


“(2) “Low-income resident” means a District resident with a gross income at or
below 250% of the federal poverty level.
“(3) “Program” means the Community Service Debt Repayment Program
established pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
“(b) The Mayor shall establish a Community Service Debt Repayment Program to reduce
the amount of civil fines or penalties owed by low-income residents resulting from the issuance
of:
“(1) Those notices of infraction that would be processed and adjudicated pursuant
to the provisions of Title II that were detected by an automated traffic enforcement system
pursuant to section 901 of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Act of 1996, effective April 9,
1997 (D.C. Law 11-198; D.C. Official Code § 50-2209.01); or
“(2) Notices of infraction that would be processed and adjudicated pursuant to the
provisions of Title III.
“(c)(1) Under the Program, a low-income resident may, pursuant to rules issued by the
Mayor, for each hour of community service performed, reduce the amount he or she owes by an
amount equivalent to the minimum hourly wage described in section 4(a)(5) of the Minimum
Wage Act Revision Act of 1992, effective March 25, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code
§ 32-1003(a)(5)).
“(2) The Mayor shall not impose on a low-income resident who participates in the
Program any enrollment fee nor any other additional fees associated with participation in the
Program.


“(3) A low-income resident may choose to reduce any portion of the amount the
low-income resident owes through participation in the Program, and participation in the Program
shall not be predicated on a commitment by a low-income resident to reduce any specified
amount owed.
“(d) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
rules to implement the provisions of this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).